Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-508
Information technology clearinghouse, defined.

Information technology clearinghouse means a service to provide convenient access for the commission and general public to information about best technology practices, referrals for technical assistance, and other information related to the Information Technology Infrastructure Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 278.